en: Ground & Leaf Blower Attachments
xx: Ground & Leaf Blower Attachments
cs: Nástavce pro vysávání a foukání listí
da: Mundstykker til løvblæsere
de: Laubbläser-Aufsätze
es: Complementos para sopladores de suelo y de hojas
fr: Adaptateurs souffleurs
it: Prolunghe per soffia-terra e soffia-foglie
ja: ブロワー用アタッチメント
nl: Hulpstukken voor bladblazers
no: Deler til løvblåsere
pl: Przystawki do dmuchaw do liści
pt: Adaptadores para sopradores de folhas
ru: Насадки для садовых воздуходувок
sv: Lövblåstillbehör
tr: Yer ve Yaprak Üfleme Makinesi Ataşmanları

en: Hedge Trimmer Attachments
xx: Hedge Trimmer Attachments
cs: Nástavce pro stříhání živých plotů
da: Udstyr til hækklippere
de: Heckenscheren-Aufsätze
es: Complementos para cortasetos
fr: Adaptateurs taille-haies
it: Prolunghe per tosasiepi
ja: ヘッジトリマー用アタッチメント
nl: Hulpstukken voor heggenscharen
no: Deler til hekksakser
pl: Nasadki do nożyc do żywopłotu
pt: Peças para aparador de cerca viva
ru: Насадки для шпалерных ножниц
sv: Häckklippardelar
tr: Çit Kesme Makinesi Bağlantı Parçaları

en: Pole Saw Attachments
xx: Pole Saw Attachments
cs: Nástavce s řetězovou pilou
da: Tilbehør til teleskopsave
de: Stangensägen-Aufsätze
es: Complementos para sierras de pértiga
fr: Manches télescopiques pour scies
it: Prolunghe per svettatoi
ja: 高枝切りチェーンソー用アタッチメント
nl: Hulpstukken voor telescoopzagen
no: Deler til stangsager
pl: Przystawki do pił na wysięgniku
pt: Peças para serras de poda com cabo extensor
ru: Штанговые пилы-насадки
sv: Stångsågstillbehör
tr: Yüksek Dal Testeresi Ataşmanları

en: Tiller & Cultivator Attachments
xx: Tiller & Cultivator Attachments
cs: Nástavce pro úpravu půdy
da: Tilbehør til jordfræsere og kultivatorer
de: Fräsen- und Grubber-Aufsätze
es: Complementos para arados y multicultores
fr: Adaptateurs motoculteur et cultivateur
it: Prolunghe per dissodatori e sarchiatrici
ja: 耕運機用アタッチメント
nl: Hulpstukken voor cultivators
no: Tilbehør til jordfresere og kultivatorer
pl: Przystawki do glebogryzarek i kultywatorów
pt: Adaptadores para cultivadores
ru: Насадки-культиваторы
sv: Knivharvs- och kultivatortillbehör
tr: Tiller ve Kültivatör Ataşmanları

en: Weed Trimmer Attachments
xx: Weed Trimmer Attachments
cs: Nástavce s křovinořezem
da: Udstyr til græstrimmere
de: Unkrauttrimmer-Aufsätze
es: Complementos para desbrozadoras
fr: Kits pour débroussailleuses
it: Prolunghe per tagliabordi
ja: 草刈り機用アタッチメント
nl: Hulpstukken voor onkruidtrimmers
no: Ekstrautstyr til gresstrimmere
pl: Przystawki do nożyc do chwastów
pt: Peças para aparador de erva daninha
ru: Насадки для косилок-триммеров
sv: Ogräsklippardelar
tr: Ot Kesme Makinesi Bağlantı Parçaları

en: Outdoor Power Equipment Batteries
xx: Outdoor Power Equipment Batteries
cs: Baterie k zahradnímu nářadí
da: Batterier til elektriske haveredskaber
de: Batterien für elektrische Kombi-Gartenmaschinen
es: Baterías para equipos motorizados para uso exterior
fr: Batteries pour outils de jardin à moteur
it: Batterie per attrezzature motorizzate per esterni
ja: ガーデン機器用バッテリー
nl: Accu's voor elektrisch tuingereedschap
no: Batterier til håndholdte hagemaskiner
pl: Akumulatory do elektronarzędzi ogrodowych
pt: Baterias para equipamento para jardinagem
ru: Аккумуляторы для электрооборудования для уличных работ
sv: Elutrustningsbatterier för utomhusbruk
tr: Dış Mekan Elektrikli Ekipman Bataryaları

en: Pressure Washer Accessories
xx: Pressure Washer Accessories
cs: Tlakové čističe – příslušenství
da: Højtryksrenser – tilbehør
de: Hochdruckreiniger-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para limpiadoras a presión
fr: Accessoires pour nettoyeur haute pression
it: Accessori per idropulitrici
ja: 高圧洗浄機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor hogedrukreinigers
no: Tilbehør til høytrykksspylere
pl: Akcesoria do myjek ciśnieniowych
pt: Acessórios para lavadora de alta pressão
ru: Принадлежности для моек высокого давления
sv: Tillbehör till högtryckstvättar
tr: Basınçlı Yıkama Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Snow Blower Accessories
xx: Snow Blower Accessories
cs: Sněhové frézy – příslušenství
da: Snekaster – tilbehør
de: Schneefräsenzubehör
es: Accesorios de fresadoras de nieve
fr: Accessoires pour souffleuses à neige
it: Accessori soffiatori neve
ja: 除雪機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor sneeuwblazers
no: Tilbehør til snøfresere
pl: Akcesoria do odśnieżarek
pt: Acessórios para ventilador de neve
ru: Принадлежности для снегоуборочных машин
sv: Tillbehör till snöslungor
tr: Kar Küreme Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Tractor Parts & Accessories
xx: Tractor Parts & Accessories
cs: Díly a příslušenství k traktorům
da: Traktordele og tilbehør
de: Traktorteile & Zubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas para tractores
fr: Pièces et accessoires pour tracteurs
it: Componenti e accessori per trattori
ja: トラクター関連用品
nl: Tractoronderdelen en -accessoires
no: Traktordeler og -tilbehør
pl: Części i akcesoria do ciągników
pt: Peças e acessórios para tratores
ru: Детали и принадлежности для тракторов
sv: Traktordelar och tillbehör
tr: Traktör Parça ve Aksesuarları

en: Tractor Tires
xx: Tractor Tires
cs: Traktorové pneumatiky
da: Traktordæk
de: Traktorreifen
es: Neumáticos para tractores
fr: Pneus de tracteurs
it: Pneumatici per trattori
ja: トラクター用タイヤ
nl: Tractorbanden
no: Traktordekk
pl: Opony do ciągników
pt: Pneus de trator
ru: Шины для тракторов
sv: Traktordäck
tr: Traktör Lastikleri

en: Tractor Wheels
xx: Tractor Wheels
cs: Traktorová kola
da: Traktorhjul
de: Traktorräder
es: Ruedas para tractores
fr: Roues de tracteurs
it: Ruote per trattori
ja: トラクター用ホイール
nl: Tractorwielen
no: Traktorhjul
pl: Koła do ciągników
pt: Rodas de trator
ru: Колеса для тракторов
sv: Traktorhjul
tr: Traktör Tekerlekleri

en: Weed Trimmer Accessories
xx: Weed Trimmer Accessories
cs: Křovinořezy – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til græstrimmere
de: Unkrauttrimmer-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para desbrozadoras
fr: Accessoires pour débroussailleuses
it: Accessori per tagliabordi
ja: 草刈り機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor onkruidtrimmers
no: Tilbehør til gresstrimmere
pl: Akcesoria do nożyc do chwastów
pt: Acessórios para aparador de erva daninha
ru: Принадлежности для косилок-триммеров
sv: Ogräsklippartillbehör
tr: Ot Kesme Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Weed Trimmer Blades & Spools
xx: Weed Trimmer Blades & Spools
cs: Křovinořezy – čepele a cívky
da: Blade og liner til græstrimmere
de: Messer & Kabelrollen für Rasentrimmer
es: Cuchillas y cabezales para desbrozadoras
fr: Lames et bobines pour débroussailleuses
it: Lame e bobine per tagliabordi
ja: 草刈り機用替刃・スプール
nl: Bladen en spoelen voor onkruidtrimmers
no: Blader og spoler til gresstrimmere
pl: Ostrza i żyłki do nożyc
pt: Lâminas e carreteis para aparador de grama
ru: Лезвия и катушки для косилок-триммеров
sv: Blad och spolar till ogräsklippare
tr: Ot Kesme Makinesi Bıçakları ve Makaraları

en: Weed Trimmer Spool Covers
xx: Weed Trimmer Spool Covers
cs: Křovinořezy – kryty cívek
da: Kassetter til græstrimmere
de: Abdeckungen für Rasentrimmer-Kabelrollen
es: Cubiertas para cabezales de desbrozadoras
fr: Couvercles de bobines pour débroussailleuses
it: Coperture per bobine per tagliabordi
ja: 草刈り機用スプールカバー
nl: Spoeldeksels voor onkruidtrimmers
no: Spoledeksler til gresstrimmere
pl: Osłony na żyłkę
pt: Capas para carretel de aparador de grama
ru: Крышки катушек для косилок-триммеров
sv: Spolhöljen till ogräsklippare
tr: Ot Kesme Makinesi Makara Kapakları

en: Snow Removal
xx: Snow Removal
cs: Odstraňování sněhu
da: Snerydning
de: Schnee- und Eisbeseitigung
es: Quitanieves
fr: Déblaiement de la neige
it: Rimozione della neve
ja: 雪かき
nl: Sneeuwruimen
no: Snøfjerning
pl: Odśnieżanie
pt: Remoção de neve
ru: Товары для уборки снега
sv: Snöborttagning
tr: Kar Temizleme

en: Ice Scrapers & Snow Brushes
xx: Ice Scrapers & Snow Brushes
cs: Škrabky na led a smetáčky na sníh
da: Isskrabere og snebørster
de: Eiskratzer & Schneebesen
es: Rasquetas para hielo y nieve
fr: Racloirs à glace et balais à neige
it: Raschietti per ghiaccio e spazzole da neve
ja: アイススクレーパー
nl: IJsschrapers en sneeuwborstels
no: Isskrapere og snøbørster
pl: Skrobaczki do lodu i szczotki do śniegu
pt: Raspadores de gelo e escovas para neve
ru: Скребки для льда и щетки для снега
sv: Isskrapor och snöborstar
tr: Buz Kazıyıcılar ve Kar Fırçaları

en: Snow Shovels
xx: Snow Shovels
cs: Lopaty na sníh
da: Sneskovle
de: Schneeschaufeln
es: Palas para nieve
fr: Pelles à neige, Pelle à neige (luge)
it: Pale da neve
ja: 雪かきスコップ
nl: Sneeuwschuivers
no: Snøskuffer
pl: Łopaty do odśnieżania
pt: Pás de neve
ru: Лопаты для уборки снега
sv: Snöskyfflar
tr: Kar Kürekleri

en: Watering & Irrigation
xx: Watering & Irrigation
cs: Závlahové systémy
da: Vanding
de: Bewässerungssysteme
es: Sistemas de riego
fr: Arrosage et irrigation
it: Impianti di irrigazione
ja: 散水用品
nl: Beregening en irrigatie
no: Vanning og overrisling
pl: Nawadnianie
pt: Sistemas de irrigação
ru: Оросительные системы
sv: Bevattning
tr: Sulama ve Tarımsal Sulama

en: Garden Hose Fittings & Valves
xx: Garden Hose Fittings & Valves
cs: Armatury a kohouty k zahradním hadicím
da: Haveslange – koblinger og ventiler
de: Gartenschlauchzubehör & -ventile
es: Válvulas y adaptadores para mangueras de jardín
fr: Valves et raccords de tuyau d'arrosage
it: Attrezzatura per strumenti da giardino e valvole
ja: ホース用継手・バルブ
nl: Hulpstukken en ventielen voor tuinslangen
no: Deler og ventiler til hageslanger
pl: Osprzęt i zawory do węży ogrodowych
pt: Equipamentos e válvulas para mangueiras de jardim
ru: Фитинги и краны для садовых шлангов
sv: Beslag och ventiler för vattenslangar
tr: Bahçe Hortumu Bağlantı Parçaları ve Vanaları

en: Garden Hose Spray Nozzles
xx: Garden Hose Spray Nozzles
cs: Rozprašovače k zahradním hadicím
da: Haveslange – strålespidser
de: Gartenschlauchsprühköpfe
es: Boquillas de mangueras de jardín
fr: Lances\, pistolets & fusils d'arrosage
it: Ugelli spruzzatori tubi da giardino
ja: ホース用スプレーノズル
nl: Sproeikoppen voor tuinslangen
no: Munnstykker til hageslanger
pl: Dysze do węży ogrodowych
pt: Bocais de pulverização para mangueiras de jardim
ru: Распылители для садовых шлангов
sv: Duschpistoler för vattenslangar
tr: Bahçe Hortumu Püskürtme Ağızlıkları